Georgia, session 2025_26, HB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 27 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
hunting, is amended in Code Section 27-3-24, relating to restrictions on hunting feral hogs,
by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) It shall be unlawful to hunt, or engage in the hunting of, feral hogs:
(1) Upon the lands of another or to enter upon the lands of another in pursuit of feral
hogs without first obtaining permission from the landowner or lessee of such land or the
lessee of the game rights of such land;
(2) Upon any land which is posted without having the permission required by
paragraph (1) of this subsection in writing and carried upon the person; or
(3) During the firearms deer season unless the hunter and each person accompanying the
hunter are wearing a total of at least 500 square inches of daylight fluorescent orange or
H. B. 167
- 1 -

LC 44 2932/AP
fluorescent pink material as an outer garment and such material or garment is worn above
the waistline, and may include a head covering."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 27-3-25, relating to hunting bears
and required outer garments, as follows:
"27-3-25.
It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt bears or for any person to accompany another
person hunting bears unless each person shall wear a total of at least 500 square inches of
daylight fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink material as an outer garment during
firearms and primitive weapons seasons. Such clothing must be worn above the waistline
and may include a head covering."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 27-3-40, relating to hunting deer
and required clothing, as follows:
"27-3-40.
It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt deer or for any person to accompany another
person hunting deer during the firearms deer season unless each person shall wear a total
of at least 500 square inches of daylight fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink material as
an outer garment. Such clothing must be worn above the waistline and may include a head
covering."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 167
- 2 -